Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.180

Nonrecourse revenue bonds as legal investment.

The bonds or [of] the authority are securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and all counties, cities, municipal corporations and political subdivisions, all banks, eligible banking organizations, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance companies and associations, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control.

[ 1989 c 279 s 19.]